Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 13. Inspection of Motor Vehicles

§§ 63-13-1 through 63-13-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 417, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§63-13-1. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1961.]

§63-13-3. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 572, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 7, 1966).]

§63-13-5. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 456; Laws, 1968, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 561, § 24, eff from and after July 2, 1980.]

§63-13-7. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 456; Laws, 1968, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 556 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).]

§63-13-8. [Laws, 1977, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 328, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§63-13-9. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 456; Laws, 1968, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 437, § 7; Laws, 1995, ch. 475, § 22; Laws, 2005, ch. 328, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§63-13-11. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 456; Laws, 1968, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 396, § 6; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1986.]

§63-13-13. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-09; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 9, eff from and after January 1, 1961.]

§63-13-15. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1961.]

§63-13-17. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-07; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 1961.]

§63-13-19. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8258-04, 8258-07; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, §§ 4, 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 529, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).]

§63-13-21. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8258-03, 8258-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 529; Laws, 1977, ch. 317, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved February 25, 1977).]

§63-13-23. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 529, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).]

§63-13-25. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-08; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 8, eff from and after January 1, 1961.]

§63-13-27. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 456; Laws, 1968, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 396, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1976.]

§63-13-29. [Codes, 1942, § 8258-10; Laws, 1960, ch. 408, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1961.]